Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for expenses of the Executive Department, being the Governor's Office and staff, and for expenses incidental to the proper operation of the Governor's Mansion and residence of the Governor for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........................................... ............................................ $ 3,206,626.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in Special Funds in the State Treasury to the credit of the Governor's Office for the purpose of defraying the expenses incurred by the Executive Department, being the Governor's Office and staff, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 ............................................ $ 637,372.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this act, the following positions are authorized: AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:           39 Time-Limited:         7 Any escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Executive Department shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 6.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 7.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.